Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE B. FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6914. PETTUS MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6914.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of supervisors of the district.

(2) "District" means the Pettus Municipal Utility District.

(3) "Supervisor" means a member of the board.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is:

(1) a conservation and reclamation district in Bee County under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution;

(2) a fresh water supply district; and

(3) a municipal corporation.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the creation of the district and the improvements that the district will purchase, construct, or otherwise acquire.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district is composed of the territory described by Section 1, Chapter 38, Acts of the 57th Legislature, 3rd Called Session, 1962, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter G, Chapter 53, Water Code, before September 1, 1995;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF SUPERVISORS

Sec. 6914.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board consists of five elected supervisors.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6914.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has all the rights, powers, privileges, and duties provided by general law applicable to a fresh water supply district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49 and 53, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.102. ACQUISITION OF IMPROVEMENTS. (a) The district may make, construct, or otherwise acquire improvements inside or outside the district but wholly in Bee County, that are necessary to carry out a power granted to the district under this chapter or a general law described by Section 6914.101.

(b) Before awarding a contract for the construction of an improvement, the district must submit a plan and specifications for the improvement to the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality for approval. Any substantial change made to the plan after submission must also be submitted to the commission for approval.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.103. COST OF RELOCATING OR ALTERING PROPERTY. (a) In this section, "sole expense" means the actual cost of relocating, raising, lowering, rerouting, changing the grade of, or altering the construction of a facility described by Subsection (b) in providing comparable replacement without enhancement of the facility, after deducting from that cost the net salvage value of the old facility.

(b) If the district's exercise of the power of eminent domain, the power of relocation, or any other power granted under this chapter makes necessary relocating, raising, rerouting, changing the grade of, or altering the construction of a highway, railroad, electric transmission line, telephone or telegraph property or facility, or pipeline, the necessary action shall be accomplished at the sole expense of the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

Sec. 6914.104. ADDITION OF TERRITORY TO DISTRICT. (a) The district may be composed of noncontiguous territory.

(b) In addition to adding land as provided by Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code, the district may add land as provided by this section. Land added to the district need not be contiguous to the district.

(c) The owner of land may request by petition that the board include the land in the district.

(d) A petition under Subsection (c) must be filed with the board and describe the land to be added to the district. The description may be by metes and bounds or by lot and block number. The petition must be signed and executed in the manner provided by law for the conveyance of real estate.

(e) The board shall hear and consider a petition filed under this section. The board may grant the petition and add the land to the district if the board considers the addition to be to the advantage of the district.

(f) A petition granted under this section shall be filed and recorded in the office of the Bee County Clerk.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6914.151. DISTRICT TAX ASSESSOR-COLLECTOR. (a) The board shall appoint a tax assessor-collector for the district for a term not to exceed the term of office of the supervisors making the appointment.

(b) The district's tax assessor-collector is not required to be a resident or voter of the district.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 855 (S.B. 1162), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2017.